ja: パイクラストライプ: オールバターショートクラスト; アーモンドショートクラスト; チョコレートクッキークラスト; パイ生地 (折りパイ); グルテンフリークラスト; グラハムクラッカークラスト; クラストなし; 焼かないクラスト; ナッツクラスト; フィロ生地クラスト; パフペストリー; ショートブレッド; ショートクラストペストリー; 全粒粉クラスト; その他
nb: Type paideig: Mørdeig med bare smør; Mandel-mørdeig; Sjokoladekjeksbunn; Smørdeig; Glutenfri paibunn; Graham-kjeksbunn; Uten bunn; Bunn uten steking; Nøttebunn; Filodeig; Butterdeig; Kjeksbunn; Mørdeig; Fullkornsbunn; Annet
es: Tipo de masa de tarta: Masa quebrada solo con mantequilla; Masa quebrada de almendras; Base de galleta de chocolate; Masa hojaldrada; Base sin gluten; Base de galleta Graham; Sin base; Base sin hornear; Base de nuez; Base de masa filo; Hojaldre; Masa de mantequilla; Masa quebrada; Base de trigo integral; Otra
sv: Typ av pajdeg: Mördeg med smör; Mördeg med mandel; Chokladkakbotten; Frasdeg; Glutenfri botten; Grahamsbotten; Ingen botten (bottenlös); Botten utan gräddning; Nötbotten; Filodegsbotten; Smördegsbotten; Mördeg; Mördeg; Fullkornsbotten; Övrigt
pt-PT: tipo de massa de tarte: Massa quebrada de manteiga; Massa quebrada de amêndoa; Base de bolacha de chocolate; Massa folhada; Base sem glúten; Base de bolacha graham; Sem base; Base sem cozedura; Base de frutos secos; Base de massa filo; Massa folhada; Biscoito amanteigado; Massa quebrada; Base de trigo integral; Outra
sk-SK: Typ cesta na koláč: Celomaslové krehké cesto; Mandľové krehké cesto; Kakaový sušienkový korpus; Krehké lístkové cesto; Bezlepkový korpus; Grahamový sušienkový korpus; Bez korpusu; Nepečený korpus; Orechový korpus; Cesto filo; Lístkové cesto; Maslové cesto; Krehké cesto; Celozrnný korpus; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta kore za pitu: Prhko tijesto od maslaca; Prhko tijesto od badema; Kora od čokoladnih keksa; Prhko slojevito tijesto; Kora bez glutena; Kora od graham krekera; Bez kore; Kora koja se ne peče; Kora od orašastih plodova; Kora od vučenog tijesta; Lisnato tijesto; Shortbread tijesto; Prhko tijesto; Kora od cjelovitog pšenicnog brašna; Ostalo
da: Type tærtebund: Mørdej udelukkende med smør; Mørdej med mandler; Bund af chokoladesmåkager; Flagedej; Glutenfri tærtebund; Bund af grahamskiks; Uden bund; Bund der ikke skal bages; Nøddebund; Filodej; Butterdej; Shortbread; Mørdej; Fuldkornsbund; Andet
lt-LT: Pyrago pagrindo tipas: Trapi tešla su sviestu; Trapi tešla su migdolais; Šokoladinių sausainių pagrindas; Trapi sluoksniuota tešla; Pagrindas be glitimo; „Graham“ krekerių pagrindas; Be tešlos (be pagrindo); Nekepamas pagrindas; Riešutų pagrindas; „Filo“ tešlos pagrindas; Sluoksniuota tešla; Trapi tešla (sausainių); Trapi tešla; Pilno grūdo pagrindas; Kita
el: Τύπος ζύμης για πίτα: Ζύμη τάρτας με βούτυρο; Ζύμη τάρτας με αμύγδαλο; Βάση από μπισκότο σοκολάτας; Τριφτή ζύμη; Βάση χωρίς γλουτένη; Βάση από μπισκότα graham; Χωρίς βάση; Βάση χωρίς ψήσιμο; Βάση ξηρών καρπών; Βάση από φύλλο κρούστας; Σφολιάτα; Ζύμη shortbread; Ζύμη τάρτας; Βάση ολικής άλεσης; Άλλο
ru: Тип коржа для пирога: Песочное тесто на сливочном масле; Миндальное песочное тесто; Основа из шоколадного печенья; Рубленое тесто; Безглютеновая основа; Основа из крекеров Грэма; Без основы; Основа без выпечки; Ореховая основа; Основа из теста фило; Слоеное тесто; Основа из песочного печенья; Песочное тесто; Цельнозерновая основа; Другое
cs: Typ křehkého těsta: Máslové křehké těsto; Mandlové křehké těsto; Čokoládový sušenkový základ; Lístkové těsto; Bezlepkový základ; Grahamový základ; Bez krusty; Nepečený základ; Ořechový základ; Filo těsto; Listové těsto; Máslové sušenkové těsto; Křehké těsto; Celozrnný základ; Ostatní
fr: Type de pâte à tarte: Pâte brisée pur beurre; Pâte brisée aux amandes; Croûte de biscuits au chocolat; Pâte feuilletée; Pâte sans gluten; Croûte de biscuits Graham; Sans croûte; Pâte sans cuisson; Croûte aux noix; Pâte phyllo; Pâte feuilletée; Pâte sablée; Pâte brisée; Pâte au blé complet; Autre
zh-TW: 派皮類型: 全奶油酥皮; 杏仁酥皮; 巧克力餅乾派皮; 千層酥皮; 無麩質派皮; 全麥餅乾派皮; 無派皮; 免烤派皮; 堅果派皮; 費洛酥皮; 泡芙酥皮; 奶油酥餅; 酥脆派皮; 全麥派皮; 其他
pt-BR: Torta tipo de crosta: Massa podre de manteiga; Massa podre de amêndoa; Massa de biscoito de chocolate; Massa quebradiça; Massa sem glúten; Massa de biscoito Graham; Sem massa; Massa sem forno; Massa de nozes; Massa filo; Massa folhada; Massa amanteigada; Massa podre; Massa integral; Outros
pl: Typ spodu do tarty: Kruche ciasto w całości na maśle; Kruche ciasto migdałowe; Spód z ciasteczek czekoladowych; Ciasto półkruche; Spód bezglutenowy; Spód z krakersów graham; Bez spodu (crustless); Spód bez pieczenia; Spód orzechowy; Ciasto filo; Ciasto francuskie; Ciasto maślane; Ciasto kruche; Spód pełnoziarnisty; Inny
nl: Taartbodem type: Roomboterzanddeeg; Amandelzanddeeg; Chocoladekoekjesbodem; Bladerdeeg (flaky); Glutenvrije bodem; Graham-crackerbodem; Geen bodem (bodemloos); No-bake-bodem; Notenbodem; Filodeegbodem; Bladerdeeg; Shortbread; Zanddeeg; Volkorenbodem; Overige
vi: Loại vỏ bánh: Vỏ bánh bơ; Vỏ bánh hạnh nhân; Vỏ bánh quy sô-cô-la; Vỏ bánh ngàn lớp; Vỏ bánh không chứa gluten; Vỏ bánh quy Graham; Không có vỏ bánh; Vỏ bánh không nướng; Vỏ bánh hạt; Vỏ bánh phyllo; Vỏ bánh xốp; Vỏ bánh quy bơ; Vỏ bánh shortcrust; Vỏ bánh lúa mì nguyên cám; Khác
de: Art des Kuchenbodens: Butter-Mürbeteig; Mandel-Mürbeteig; Schokoladenkeks-Boden; Blättriger Teig; Glutenfreier Boden; Graham-Cracker-Boden; Ohne Boden; Boden ohne Backen; Nussboden; Filoteig-Boden; Blätterteig; Shortbread; Mürbeteig; Vollkornboden; Andere
th: ประเภทของเปลือกพาย: แป้งพายร่วนเนยล้วน; แป้งพายร่วนอัลมอนด์; ฐานพายคุกกี้ช็อกโกแลต; แป้งพายชั้นแบบร่วน; แป้งพายไร้กลูเตน; ฐานพายเกรแฮมแครกเกอร์; ไม่มีแป้งพาย (ไร้ขอบ); ฐานพายแบบไม่อบ; ฐานพายถั่ว; แป้งพายฟิลโล; แป้งพายพัฟ; ชอร์ตเบรด; แป้งพายร่วน; แป้งพายโฮลวีต; อื่นๆ
hu: Pitetészta típusa: Vajas omlós tészta; Mandulás omlós tészta; Csokiskeksz-alap; Leveles tészta; Gluténmentes tészta; Graham kekszes alap; Tészta nélküli; Sütés nélküli alap; Diós alap; Filotészta; Vajas leveles tészta; Vajas keksz; Omlós tészta; Teljes kiőrlésű tészta; Egyéb
it: Tipo di crosta per torta: Pasta frolla al burro; Pasta frolla alle mandorle; Fondo di biscotti al cioccolato; Pasta sfoglia; Impasto senza glutine; Fondo di graham cracker; Senza crosta; Fondo senza cottura; Fondo di frutta secca; Pasta fillo; Pasta sfoglia; Pasta frolla; Pasta brisée; Impasto integrale; Altro
zh-CN: 派皮类型: 全黄油短酥皮; 杏仁短酥皮; 巧克力饼干底; 酥皮; 无麸质派皮; 全麦饼干底; 无派皮; 免烤派皮; 坚果派皮; 费罗酥皮; 千层酥皮; 脆饼; 短酥皮; 全麦派皮; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta testa za pito: Masleno krhko testo; Mandljevo krhko testo; Čokoladna piškotna podlaga; Krhko listnato testo; Testo brez glutena; Podlaga iz graham krekerjev; Brez testa; Testo brez peke; Oreščkova podlaga; Vlečeno testo; Listnato testo; Piškotna podlaga; Krhko testo; Polnozrnato testo; Drugo
en: Pie crust type: All-Butter Shortcrust; Almond Shortcrust; Chocolate Cookie Crust; Flaky Pastry; Gluten-Free Crust; Graham Cracker Crust; No Crust (Crustless); No-Bake Crust; Nut Crust; Phyllo Crust; Puff Pastry; Shortbread; Shortcrust Pastry; Whole Wheat Crust; Other
fi: Piirakkapohjan tyyppi: Voimurotaikina; Mantelimurotaikina; Suklaakeksipohja; Lehtitaikina; Gluteeniton pohja; Grahamkeksipohja; Ei pohjaa (pohjaton); Paistamaton pohja; Pähkinäpohja; Fillotaikinapohja; Voitaikina; Murotaikina; Murotaikinapohja; Täysjyväpohja; Muu
ko: 파이 크러스트 유형: 올버터 쇼트크러스트; 아몬드 쇼트크러스트; 초콜릿 쿠키 크러스트; 플레이키 페이스트리; 글루텐 프리 크러스트; 그레이엄 크래커 크러스트; 크러스트 없음(크러스트리스); 노베이크 크러스트; 넛 크러스트; 필로 크러스트; 퍼프 페이스트리; 쇼트브레드; 쇼트크러스트 페이스트리; 통밀 크러스트; 기타
ro-RO: Tip crustă de plăcintă: Aluat fraged cu unt; Aluat fraged cu migdale; Blat de biscuiți cu ciocolată; Aluat în foi; Blat fără gluten; Blat de biscuiți graham; Fără blat; Blat fără coacere; Blat de nuci; Blat din foi de plăcintă (phyllo); Aluat foietaj; Aluat de fursecuri (shortbread); Aluat fraged (shortcrust); Blat din grâu integral; Altele
bg-BG: Вид тестена основа за пай: Изцяло маслено ронливо тесто; Бадемово ронливо тесто; Основа от шоколадови бисквити; Многолистно тесто; Основа без глутен; Основа от крекери Греъм; Без основа; Основа без печене; Ядкова основа; Фило тесто; Бутер тесто; Маслено тесто; Ронливо маслено тесто; Пълнозърнеста основа; Друго
tr: Turta hamuru türü: Tamamen tereyağlı tart hamuru; Bademli tart hamuru; Çikolatalı bisküvi tabanı; Kat kat hamur; Glutensiz hamur; Graham kraker tabanı; Hamursuz; Pişirme gerektirmeyen taban; Kuruyemişli taban; Baklavalık yufka tabanı; Milföy hamuru; Kurabiye hamuru; Tart hamuru; Tam buğdaylı hamur; Diğer